src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_laavu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests: 

  Noun - láávu: # ok LAAVU
    láávu+N+Sg+Nom:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Gen:  [láávu, lávo]
    láávu+N+Sg+Acc:  [láávu, lávo]
    láávu+N+Sg+Ill:  láávun
    láávu+N+Sg+Loc:  [láávust, láávoost]
    láávu+N+Sg+Com:  [láávoin, láávooin]
    láávu+N+Sg+Abe:  [lávuttáá, lávottáá]
    láávu+N+Ess:  láávvun
    láávu+N+Par:  láávvud
    láávu+N+Pl+Nom:  [láávuh, lávoh]
    láávu+N+Pl+Gen:  [láávui, lávui, lávoi]
    láávu+N+Pl+Acc:  [láávuid, láávoid]
    láávu+N+Pl+Ill:  [láávoid, láávooid]
    láávu+N+Pl+Loc:  [láávuin, lávoin]
    láávu+N+Pl+Com:  [lávuiguin, lávuigijn, lávoiguin, lávoigijn]
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe:  [lávuittáá, lávoittáá]


  Noun - puáđu: # ok 2LAAVU
    puáđu+N+Sg+Nom:   puáđu
    puáđu+N+Sg+Gen:  [puáđu, puáđo]
    puáđu+N+Sg+Acc:  [puáđu, puáđo]
    puáđu+N+Sg+Ill:   puáđun
    puáđu+N+Sg+Loc:  [puáđust, puáđoost]
    puáđu+N+Sg+Com:  [puáđoin, puáđooin]
    puáđu+N+Sg+Abe:  [puáđuttáá, puáđottáá] 
    puáđu+N+Ess:      puáđđun
    puáđu+N+Par:      puáđđud
    puáđu+N+Pl+Nom:  [puáđuh, puáđoh]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáđui, puáđoi]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Acc:  [puáđuid, puáđoid]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Ill:  [puáđoid, puáđooid]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Loc:  [puáđuin, puáđoin]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Com:  [puáđuiguin, puáđuigijn, puáđoiguin, puáđoigijn]    
    puáđu+N+Pl+Abe:  [puáđuittáá, puáđoittáá]

  Noun - muátu: # ok 2LAAVU
    muátu+N+Sg+Nom:   muátu
    muátu+N+Sg+Gen:   [muáđu, muáđo]
    muátu+N+Sg+Acc:   [muáđu, muáđo]
    muátu+N+Sg+Ill:   muátun
    muátu+N+Sg+Loc:   [muáđust, muáđoost]
    muátu+N+Sg+Com:  [muáđoin, muáđooin]
    muátu+N+Sg+Abe:   [muáđuttáá, muáđottáá]
    muátu+N+Ess:      muáttun
    muátu+N+Par:      muáttud
    muátu+N+Pl+Nom:   [muáđuh, muáđoh]
    muátu+N+Pl+Gen:   [muáđui, muáđoi]
    muátu+N+Pl+Acc:   [muáđuid, muáđoid]
    muátu+N+Pl+Ill:  [muáđoid, muáđooid]
    muátu+N+Pl+Loc:   [muáđuin, muáđoin]
    muátu+N+Pl+Com:  [muáđuiguin, muáđuigijn, muáđoiguin, muáđoigijn]
    muátu+N+Pl+Abe:   [muáđuittáá, muáđoittáá]

  Noun - láátu: # ok 2LAAVU - but is 2LAAVU the correct paradigm for láátu?
    láátu+N+Sg+Nom:   láátu
    láátu+N+Sg+Gen:   [lááđu, láđo]
    láátu+N+Sg+Acc:   [lááđu, láđo]
    láátu+N+Sg+Ill:   láátun
    láátu+N+Sg+Loc:   [lááđust, lááđoost]
    láátu+N+Sg+Com:  [lááđoin, lááđooin]
    láátu+N+Sg+Abe:   [láđuttáá, láđottáá]
    láátu+N+Ess:      lááttun
    láátu+N+Par:      lááttud
    láátu+N+Pl+Nom:   [lááđuh, láđoh]
    láátu+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđui, láđui, láđoi]
    láátu+N+Pl+Acc:   [lááđuid, lááđoid]
    láátu+N+Pl+Ill:   [lááđoid, lááđooid]
    láátu+N+Pl+Loc:   [lááđuin, láđoin]
    láátu+N+Pl+Com:  [láđuiguin, láđuigijn, láđoiguin, láđoigijn]
    láátu+N+Pl+Abe:   [láđuittáá, láđoittáá]

  Noun - pááru: # ok 2LAAVU
    pááru+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
    pááru+N+Sg+Gen: [pááru, páro]
    pááru+N+Sg+Acc: [pááru, páro]
    pááru+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
    pááru+N+Sg+Loc: [páárust, páároost]
    pááru+N+Sg+Com: [páároin, páárooin]
    pááru+N+Sg+Abe: [páruttáá, párottáá]
    pááru+N+Ess:     páárrun
    pááru+N+Par:     páárrud
    pááru+N+Pl+Nom: [pááruh, pároh]
    pááru+N+Pl+Gen: [páárui, párui, pároi]
    pááru+N+Pl+Acc: [pááruid, páároid] # páároid hardcoded # no, it is not :)
    pááru+N+Pl+Ill: [páároid, páárooid]
    pááru+N+Pl+Loc: [pááruin, pároin]
    pááru+N+Pl+Com: [páruiguin, páruigijn, pároiguin, pároigijn]
    pááru+N+Pl+Abe: [páruittáá, pároittáá]

  Noun - táálu: # ok 2LAAVU + 2LAJO
    táálu+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu 
    táálu+N+Sg+Gen:  [táálu, tálo]
    táálu+N+Sg+Acc:  [táálu, tálo]
    táálu+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
    táálu+N+Sg+Loc:  [táálust, tááloost]
    táálu+N+Sg+Com:  [tááloin, táálooin]
    táálu+N+Sg+Abe:  [táluttáá, tálottáá]
    táálu+N+Ess:     táállun
    táálu+N+Par:     táállud
    táálu+N+Pl+Nom:  [tááluh, táloh]
    táálu+N+Pl+Gen: [táálui, tálui, táloi]
    táálu+N+Pl+Acc:  [tááluid, tááloid]
    táálu+N+Pl+Ill:  [tááloid, táálooid]
    táálu+N+Pl+Loc:  [tááluin, táloin]
    táálu+N+Pl+Com: [táluiguin, táluigijn, táloiguin, táloigijn]
    táálu+N+Pl+Abe:  [táluittáá, táloittáá]



#  Noun - táálu: # ok
#    táálu+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu 
#    táálu+N+Sg+Gen:  [táálu, tálo]
#    táálu+N+Sg+Acc:  [táálu, tálo]
#    táálu+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
#    táálu+N+Sg+Loc:  [táálust, tááloost]
#    táálu+N+Sg+Com:  [tááloin, táálooin]
#    táálu+N+Sg+Abe:  [táluttáá, tálottáá]
#    táálu+N+Ess:  táállun
#    táálu+N+Par:  táállud
#    táálu+N+Pl+Nom:  [tááluh, táloh]
#    táálu+N+Pl+Gen:  [táálui, tálui]
#    táálu+N+Pl+Gen:  táloi
#    táálu+N+Pl+Acc:  [tááluid, táloid]
#    táálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tááloid
#    táálu+N+Pl+Loc:  [tááluin, táloin]
#    táálu+N+Pl+Com:  [táluiguin, táluigijn]
#    táálu+N+Pl+Abe:  [táluittáá, táloittáá]
#
#  Noun - tiätu: # u-stems - ok
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Nom: tiätu
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Gen: [tiäđu, tiäđo]
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Acc: [tiäđu, tiäđo]
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Ill: tiätun
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Loc: [tiäđust, tiäđoost]
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Com: [tiäđuin, tiäđoin]
#    tiätu+N+Sg+Abe: [tiäđuttáá, tiäđottáá]
#    tiätu+N+Ess: tiättun
#    tiätu+N+Par: tiättud
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Nom: [tiäđuh, tiäđoh]
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Gen: [tiäđui, tiäđoi]
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Acc: [tiäđuid, tiäđoid]
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Ill: tiäđoid
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Loc: [tiäđuin, tiäđoin]
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Com: [tiäđuiguin, tiäđuigijn]
#    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: [tiäđuittáá, tiäđoittáá]
#
#  Noun - máánu: # ok MAANU
#    máánu+N+Sg+Nom:  máánu
#    máánu+N+Sg+Gen:  [máánu, máno]
#    máánu+N+Sg+Acc:  [máánu, máno]
#    máánu+N+Sg+Ill:  máánun
#    máánu+N+Sg+Loc:  [máánust, máánoost]
#    máánu+N+Sg+Com:  [máánuin, mánoin]
#    máánu+N+Sg+Abe:  [mánuttáá, mánottáá]
#    máánu+N+Ess:  máánnun
#    máánu+N+Par:  máánnud
#    máánu+N+Pl+Nom:  [máánuh, mánoh]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Gen:  [máánui, mánui]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Acc:  [máánuid, mánoid]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Ill:  [máánuid, mánoid]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Loc:  [máánuin, mánoin]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Com:  [mánuiguin, mánuigijn]
#    máánu+N+Pl+Abe:  [mánuittáá, mánoittáá]
#
#
#  Noun - vuáru:   
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Nom: vuáru
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Gen: [vuáru, vuáro]
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Acc: [vuáru, vuáro]
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Ill: vuárun
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Loc: [vuárust, vuároost]
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Com: vuároin
#    vuáru+N+Sg+Abe: [vuáruttáá, vuárottáá]
#    vuáru+N+Ess: vuárrun
#    vuáru+N+Par: vuárrud
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Nom: [vuáruh, vuároh]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárui, vuároi]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Acc: [vuáruid, vuároid]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Ill: vuároid
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Loc: [vuáruin, vuároin]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Com: [vuáruiguin, vuáruigijn]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Com: [vuároiguin, vuároigijn]
#    vuáru+N+Pl+Abe: [vuáruittáá, vuároittáá]
#
#
#
#  Noun - suánju: # ok; nj is actually one consonant
#    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suánju
#    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  [suánju, suánjo]
#    suánju+N+Sg+Acc:  [suánju, suánjo]
#    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suánjun
#    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  [suánjust, suánjoost]
#    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  [suánjuin, suánjoin]
#    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  [suánjuttáá, suánjottáá]
#    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
#    suánju+N+Par:  suánnjud
#    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  [suánjuh, suánjoh]
#    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: [suánjui, suánjoi]
#    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  [suánjuid, suánjoid]
#    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
#    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  [suánjuin, suánjoin]
#    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  [suánjuiguin, suánjuigijn]
#    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  [suánjuittáá, suánjoittáá]

#  Noun - stáálu: # ok; LAAVU gč láátu. Mo bargat?
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Nom:  stáálu
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Gen:  stáálu
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Acc:  stáálu
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Ill:  stáálun
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Loc:  stáálust
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Com:  stááloin
#    stáálu+N+Sg+Abe:  stáluttáá
#    stáálu+N+Ess:  stáállun
#    stáálu+N+Par:  stáállud
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Nom:  stááluh
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Gen:  [stáálui, stálui]
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Acc:  stááluid
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Ill:  stááloid
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Loc:  stááluin
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Com:  [stáluiguin, stáluigijn]
#    stáálu+N+Pl+Abe:  stáluittáá

#  Noun - jáámu: # ok LAAVU
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Nom:  jáámu
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Gen:  jáámu
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Acc:  jáámu
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Ill:  jáámun
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Loc:  jáámust
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Com:  jáámoin
#    jáámu+N+Sg+Abe:  jámuttáá
#    jáámu+N+Ess:  jáámmun
#    jáámu+N+Par:  jáámmud
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Nom:  jáámuh
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Gen: [jáámui, jámui]
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Acc:  jáámuid
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Ill:  jáámoid
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Loc:  jáámuin
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Com:  [jámuiguin, jámuigijn]
#    jáámu+N+Pl+Abe:  jámuittáá

#  Noun - láátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  lááđu
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  lááđu
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđust
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
#    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  láđuttáá
#    láátu+v1+N+Ess:  lááttun
#    láátu+v1+N+Par:  lááttud
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  lááđuh
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđui, láđui]
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  lááđuid
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  lááđuin
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [láđuiguin, láđuigijn]
#    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  láđuittáá
#
#  Noun - pááru+v1: # ok LAAVU
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  pááru
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  pááru
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  páárust
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Com:  páároin
#    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  páruttáá
#    pááru+v1+N+Ess:  páárrun
#    pááru+v1+N+Par:  páárrud
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  pááruh
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [páárui, párui]
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  pááruid
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  páároid
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  pááruin
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [páruiguin, páruigijn]
#    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  páruittáá
#
#  Noun - máátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  mááđu 
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđust 
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  mááđoin
#    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  máđuttáá
#    máátu+v1+N+Ess:  mááttun
#    máátu+v1+N+Par:  mááttud
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  mááđuh 
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđui, máđui]
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  mááđuid
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  mááđoid
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  mááđuin
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [máđuiguin, máđuigijn]
#    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  máđuittáá
#
#  Noun - tuálu: # ok LAAVU
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuálu
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuálu
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuálu
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuálun
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuálust
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáloin
#    tuálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáluttáá
#    tuálu+N+Ess:  tuállun
#    tuálu+N+Par:  tuállud
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáluh
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuálui
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáluid
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáloid
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáluin
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Com:  [tuáluiguin, tuáluigijn]
#    tuálu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáluittáá
#
